Tennessee, session 114, HB2370.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. On or before January 1, 2027, the department of safety shall report to the
chairs of the transportation and safety committee of the senate and the committee of the house
of representatives having jurisdiction over transportation matters, the number of persons who
participated in the motorcycle rider education program established under Tennessee Code
Annotated, Title 55, Chapter 51, during each calendar year in the last three (3) years, and the
types of expenses for which the funds in the motorcycle rider safety fund were used during the
last three (3) fiscal years.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2370
012726
- 1 -